North Dakota, session 69, SB2258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 28-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Agency enforcement of rules - Disclosure of authority.
When enforcing a rule adopted under this chapter, including through an official notice,
determination, order, or similar action, an agency shall specifically reference the statute or rule
providing the authority upon which the agency's action is based within ten days of receiving a request
for the information from the person against which the rule is being enforced.

S. B. NO. 2258 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2258.
Senate Vote: Yeas 30 Nays 17 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 2 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State